old/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
    <pardef n="اینجا__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اینجا</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اینجانب__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اینجانب</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنچه__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنچه</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="برخی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>برخی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بعضی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>بعضی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فلان__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>فلان</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فلانی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>فلانی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>کی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یکدیگر__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یکدیگر</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کس__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>کس</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کسى__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>کسى</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یکى__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یکى</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هریک__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هریک</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکدام__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکدام</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکس__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکس</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکسی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکسی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکه__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکه</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هم__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هم</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="همدیگر__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>همدیگر</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنانی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنانی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنجایی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنجایی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩﺭ__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩرباره__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="و__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="که__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دوم__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Find out what ~in means -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ین</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یک__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩﻭ__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="تاجیکستان__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فروغ__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!-- possessive pronouns -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__cons">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ت</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ش</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>مان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	</pardef>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
<!-- possessive pronouns: only when the last letter is ه and sounds `e` -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__vowel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ام</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اش</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>مان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="و"><i>و</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ای"><i>ای</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="که__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="یک"><i>یک</i><par n="یک__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ﺩﻭ"><i>ﺩﻭ</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سه"><i>سه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="چهار"><i>چهار</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="شش"><i>شش</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفت"><i>هفت</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هشت"><i>هشت</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ده"><i>ده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یازده"><i>یازده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دوازده"><i>دوازده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سیزده"><i>سیزده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="چهارده"><i>چهارده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پانزده"><i>پانزده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفده"><i>هفده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="نوزده"><i>نوزده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سی"><i>سی</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پنجاه"><i>پنجاه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفتاد"><i>هفتاد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="نود"><i>نود</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دوصد"><i>دوصد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="چون"><i>چون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="مثل"><i>مثل</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="همچون"><i>همچون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برایم"><i>برایم</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برایش"><i>برایش</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برایتان"><i>برایتان</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="یا"><i>یا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="اگرچه"><i>اگرچه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="اگرهم"><i>اگرهم</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="اما"><i>اما</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="چه"><i>چه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="کیست"><i>کیست</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="کـه"><i>کـه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="لیکن"><i>لیکن</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="مانند"><i>مانند</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="و"><i>و</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="واز"><i>واز</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="وپس"><i>وپس</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ولى"><i>ولى</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="اتریش"><i>اتریش</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ازبکستان"><i>ازبکستان</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آفریقای مرکزی"><i>آفریقای<b/>مرکزی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آنتیگوا و باربودا"><i>آنتیگوا<b/>و<b/>باربودا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ایتالیا"><i>ایتالیا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="برونئی"><i>برونئی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بوتان"><i>بوتان</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="پاناما"><i>پاناما</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="تووالو"><i>تووالو</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="زامبیا"><i>زامبیا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="سورینام"><i>سورینام</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="قبرس"><i>قبرس</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کویت"><i>کویت</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="لسوتو"><i>لسوتو</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مغولستان"><i>مغولستان</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نیکاراگوآ"><i>نیکاراگوآ</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آلاسکا"><i>آلاسکا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کارولینای شمالی"><i>کارولینای<b/>شمالی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نبراسکا"><i>نبراسکا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="بَنگِلور"><p><l>ﺐَﻧبَنگِلور</l><r>ﺐﻧگﻝﻭﺭ</r></p><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="آره"><i>آره</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ازطرف"><i>ازطرف</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اصولاً"><i>اصولاً</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اینجانبان"><i>اینجانبان</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اینقدر"><i>اینقدر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="آنهمه"><i>آنهمه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بجز"><i>بجز</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بسزایی"><i>بسزایی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بلکه"><i>بلکه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="توافقی"><i>توافقی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حالا"><i>حالا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="درآنجا"><i>درآنجا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="درصورتی"><i>درصورتی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="دوچندان"><i>دوچندان</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="صرفا"><i>صرفا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="غیر"><i>غیر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کلاً"><i>کلاً</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="متعاقبا"><i>متعاقبا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="مسلماً"><i>مسلماً</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هرحال"><i>هرحال</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="والنشر"><i>والنشر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
